Utah statutes.
58-67-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a physician and surgeon, except as set
forth in Subsection (2), shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division, which may
include:
(i)  submissions by the applicant of information maintained by practitioner
data banks, as designated by division rule, with respect to the applicant; and
(ii)  a record of professional liability claims made against the applicant and
settlements paid by or on behalf of the applicant;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of having successfully completed a
program of professional education preparing an individual as a physician and
surgeon, as evidenced by having received an earned degree of doctor of
medicine from:
(i)  an LCME accredited medical school or college; or
(ii)  a medical school or college located outside of the United States or its
jurisdictions which at the time of the applicant's graduation, met criteria
for LCME accreditation;
(e)  hold a current certification by the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates or any successor organization approved by the division in
collaboration with the board, if the applicant graduated from a medical school
or college located outside of the United States or its jurisdictions;
(f)  satisfy the division and board that the applicant:
(i)  has successfully completed 24 months of progressive resident training in
a program approved by the ACGME, the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons,
the College of Family Physicians of Canada, or any similar body in the United
States or Canada approved by the division in collaboration with the board; or
(ii) (A)  has successfully completed 12 months of resident training in an
ACGME approved program after receiving a degree of doctor of medicine as
required under Subsection (1)(d);
(B)  has been accepted in and is successfully participating in progressive
resident training in an ACGME approved program within Utah, in the applicant's
second or third year of postgraduate training; and
(C)  has agreed to surrender to the division the applicant's license as a
physician and surgeon without any proceedings under Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, and has agreed the applicant's license as a
physician and surgeon will be automatically revoked by the division if the
applicant fails to continue in good standing in an ACGME approved progressive
resident training program within the state;
(g)  pass the licensing examination sequence required by division rule made in
collaboration with the board;
(h)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board;
(i)  meet with the board and representatives of the division, if requested,
for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure;
(j)  designate:
(i)  a contact person for access to medical records in accordance with the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act; and
(ii)  an alternate contact person for access to medical records, in the event
the original contact person is unable or unwilling to serve as the contact
person for access to medical records; and
(k)  establish a method for notifying patients of the identity and location of
the contact person and alternate contact person, if the applicant will
practice in a location with no other persons licensed under this chapter.
(2)  An applicant for licensure as a physician and surgeon by endorsement
shall:
(a)  be currently licensed with a full unrestricted license in good standing
in any state, district, or territory of the United States;
(b)  have been actively engaged in the legal practice of medicine in any
state, district, or territory of the United States for not less than 6,000
hours during the five years immediately preceding the date of application for
licensure in Utah;
(c)  not have any action pending against the applicant's license;
(d)  not have a license that was suspended or revoked in any state, unless the
license was subsequently reinstated as a full unrestricted license in good
standing; and
(e)  produce satisfactory evidence of the applicant's qualifications,
identity, and good standing to the satisfaction of the division in
collaboration with the board.
(3)  An applicant for licensure by endorsement may engage in the practice of
medicine under a temporary license while the applicant's application for
licensure is being processed by the division, provided:
(a)  the applicant submits a complete application required for temporary
licensure to the division;
(b)  the applicant submits a written document to the division from:
(i)  a health care facility licensed under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care
Facility Licensing and Inspection Act, stating that the applicant is
practicing under the invitation of the health care facility; or
(ii)  two individuals licensed under this chapter, whose license is in good
standing and who practice in the same clinical location, both stating that:
(A)  the applicant is practicing under the invitation of the individual; and
(B)  the applicant will practice at the same clinical location as the
individual;
(c)  the applicant submits a signed certification to the division that the
applicant meets the requirements of Subsection (2);
(d)  the applicant does not engage in the practice of medicine until the
division has issued a temporary license;
(e)  the temporary license is only issued for and may not be extended beyond
the duration of one year from issuance; and
(f)  the temporary license expires immediately and prior to the expiration of
one year from issuance, upon notification from the division that the
applicant's application for licensure by endorsement is denied.
(4)  The division shall issue a temporary license under Subsection (3) within
15 business days after the applicant satisfies the requirements of Subsection
(3).
